District of Columbia statutes.
29-412.23

Decree of dissolution.

(a)

If, after a hearing, the Superior Court determines that one or more grounds for judicial dissolution described in § 29-412.20 exist, it may enter a decree dissolving the nonprofit corporation and specifying the effective date of the dissolution, and the clerk of the court shall deliver a certified copy of the decree to the Mayor, who shall file it.

(b)

After entering the decree of dissolution, the Superior Court shall direct the winding-up and liquidation of the nonprofit corporation’s affairs in accordance with § 29-412.05 and the notification of claimants in accordance with §§ 29-412.06 and 29-412.07.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720